Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
PUBLIC UTILITIES - ACQUISITION - METHOD

31-32-201. Financing acquisition of utilities.

In any municipality possessed of authority to acquire public utilities operating under general law or under article XX of the state constitution, unless otherwise provided by the charter of such municipality, no public utility shall be acquired until the plan for such acquisition has been adopted by ordinance and such ordinance has been approved at a regular or special election in the manner provided for authorization of bonded indebtedness by section 31-15-302 (1)(d). Nothing in this subsection (1) shall prevent the institution of condemnation proceedings as may be provided by law or require an election with respect to water facilities or sewerage facilities.

Such ordinance shall describe the property to be acquired, the full purchase price to be paid by such municipality therefor, and the method of payment thereof as well as the total obligations to be incurred by such municipality in making such acquisition, whether by way of general obligation bonds of such municipality issued under the provisions of section 6 of article XI of the state constitution or by way of obligations chargeable solely or in part against the income of such utility, or both. In the event of the issuance of obligations payable solely out of income, all operating and other costs shall be met solely out of income of the utility acquired.

Said ordinance may provide for the payment into such income fund for service to be rendered for municipal purposes, but such payments shall at all times be reasonable.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1244, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-32-201 as it existed prior to 1975.